Utah statutes.
54-8-26.   Notice that service from underground facilities is available --
Consequences of failure to convert overhead facilities.
(1) (a)  If service from the underground public utility is to be made
available to all or part of an improvement district area, the governing body
of the county or municipality that created the district shall mail a notice to
each owner of real property served from existing overhead facilities stating
that:
(i)  conversion of all facilities owned within the improvement district by a
public utility from overhead to underground to the point of delivery is
proceeding;
(ii)  the property owner is responsible for the changes in the service
entrance equipment located on the property to accommodate the conversion of
the applicable public utility's facilities from overhead to underground at the
point of delivery; and
(iii)  each owner shall coordinate with the applicable public utility to make
the conversion from overhead to underground service.
(b)  In addition to improvement district assessments, the property owner shall
bear the expense of the conversion from overhead to underground described in
Subsections (1)(a)(ii) and (iii).
(c)  Each conversion of overhead facilities to underground facilities shall
comply with all applicable state and local laws, ordinances, rules, and
regulations, and with all tariffs of the applicable public utility.
(d)  The public utility or its contractor shall perform the necessary
construction to the point of delivery, unless the public utility authorizes
another to perform the construction.
(2) (a)  Failure to have the property owner's service entrance equipment
described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) converted to accommodate underground
service within the time that the governing body specifies in writing shall be
considered as the property owner's consent to and grant of a construction
easement to the county or municipality and as express authority to the county
or municipality to arrange for qualified persons to enter upon the lot or
parcel for the purpose of making the required changes.
(b)  A construction easement under Subsection (2)(a) terminates upon
completion of the conversion of overhead facilities to underground.
(3)  If the county or municipality arranges for the conversion of the service
entrance equipment, all county, municipal, and public utility costs and
expenses of the conversion, including the engineering, legal, advertising, and
incidental expenses, shall be assessed against the property upon which the
service entrance equipment was converted and become a lien upon the property
served.
